Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 48
BULLS, RAMS, AND BOARS

Section

35-48-101. Lien one year.

The keepers of bulls, rams, and boars, in this state, have liens upon the get of such animals for the space of one year from the birth of same, for payment of service of such bull, ram, or boar.

Source:

L. 1879:

p. 190, § 1.

G.S.

§ 3193.

R.S. 08:

§ 6445.

C.L.

§ 3269.

CSA:

C. 160, § 199.

CRS 53:

§ 8-9-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-9-8.

35-48-102. Bona fide purchasers protected.

Section 35-48-101 shall not apply to a bona fide purchaser without notice of the lien.

Source:

L. 1879:

p. 190, § 2.

G.S.

§ 3194.

R.S. 08:

§ 6446.

C.L.

§ 3270.

CSA:

C. 160, § 200.

CRS 53:

§ 8-9-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-9-9.

35-48-103. Inferior bulls or rams.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to permit any inferior bull over the age of one year or any inferior ram over the age of two months to run at large in this state. Any bull shall be considered an inferior bull that is not registered or eligible for registration as a purebred animal.

Any person permitting cows of which he is the owner or agent of the owner to run at large upon the public ranges of this state shall furnish during breeding season at least one registered purebred bull of one of the recognized beef breeds, not less than eighteen months of age, for every twenty-five head of cows or fraction thereof over ten head so permitted to run at large in this state. No owner or agent of the owner shall permit any jersey, holstein, guernsey, ayrshire, or other bull not registered or eligible for registration as one of the recognized beef breeds to run at large in this state under any pretense whatever, and should any such bull break through any enclosure surrounded by a lawful fence, the owner of such animal shall be liable for all damages occasioned by such trespass.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 756, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3258.

L. 31:

p. 760, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 188.

CRS 53:

§ 8-9-10.

C.R.S. 1963

, § 8-9-10.

L. 67:

p. 314, § 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3283, § 647, effective March 1, 2022.

35-48-104. Castration of inferior animals.

It is lawful for any stock grower to castrate or cause to be castrated any inferior animal found running at large; but, if any person castrates any animal belonging to another, without permission, and on proper evidence before any competent court it is proved to the satisfaction of said court that such animal was not within the prohibition of section 35-48-103, said person so castrating such animal shall be liable for damages in three times the value of the animal so castrated and costs of suit.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 180, § 5.

L. 1874:

p. 250, § 1.

G.L.

§ 2568.

L. 1883:

p. 279, § 1.

G.S.

§ 1307.

L. 1899:

p. 250, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6436.

C.L.

§ 3240.

CSA:

C. 160, § 157.

CRS 53:

§ 8-9-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-9-11.